Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.010

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that businesses in Washington are concerned about the potential for multiple taxation that arises due to the various city business and occupation taxes and are concerned about the lack of uniformity among city jurisdictions. The current system has a negative impact on Washington's business climate. The legislature further finds that local business and occupation tax revenue provides a sizable portion of city revenue that is used for essential services. The legislature recognizes that local government services contribute to a healthy business climate.

The legislature intends to provide for a more uniform system of city business and occupation taxes that eliminates multiple taxation, while allowing for some continued local control and flexibility to cities.

[ 2003 c 79 s 1.]